Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.454

Failure to comply with chapter or rules—Civil penalties.

(1) Any person who fails to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty in an amount of not more than one thousand dollars per violation per day.

(2) The director may adopt by rule a penalty matrix that establishes procedures for civil penalties assessed under this chapter.

(3) Whenever the results of an antibiotic, pesticide, or other drug residue test on a producer's milk are above the actionable level established in the PMO, the producer is subject to a civil penalty under this section in addition to any other action taken under this chapter.

(4) The director may impose a civil penalty under this section for violations of the standards for component parts of fluid dairy products that are established in this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

(5) Each violation is a separate and distinct offense. The director shall impose the civil penalty in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. Moneys collected under this section shall be remitted to the department and deposited into the revolving fund of the Washington state dairy products commission.

[ 2013 c 7 s 3; 1999 c 291 s 18.]